fr: Types de supports inclus: Bloc de toile; Panneau de toile; Céramique; Tissu/Textile; Bloc de papier pour technique mixte; Aucune surface incluse; Bloc de papier à croquis; Toile tendue; Bloc de papier aquarelle; Panneau de bois; Autre
ro-RO: Tipuri de suprafețe incluse: Bloc de pânză; Panou de pânză; Ceramică; Material textil; Bloc de desen pentru tehnici mixte; Fără suprafață inclusă; Bloc pentru schițe; Pânză pe șasiu; Bloc de hârtie pentru acuarelă; Panou de lemn; Altele
fi: Mukana toimitettavat pintatyypit: Kangaslehtiö; Canvas-paneeli; Keramiikka; Kangas/tekstiili; Sekatekniikkalehtiö; Pintaa ei sisälly; Luonnoslehtiö; Pingotettu kangas; Akvarellilehtiö; Puupaneeli; Muu
ru: Входящие типы поверхностей: Холст в склейке; Холст на картоне; Керамика; Ткань/текстиль; Склейка бумаги для смешанных техник; Поверхность не включена; Альбом для эскизов; Холст на подрамнике; Склейка акварельной бумаги; Деревянная панель; Другое
ja: 付属表面タイプ: キャンバスパッド; キャンバスパネル; セラミック; ファブリック/テキスタイル; ミクストメディアペーパーパッド; 表面を含まない; スケッチペーパーパッド; 張りキャンバス; 水彩紙パッド; ウッドパネル; その他
da: Inkluderede overfladetyper: Lærredsblok; Lærredspanel; Keramik; Stof/Tekstil; Mixed media-papirblok; Ingen overflade inkluderet; Skitsepapirblok; Opspændt lærred; Akvarelpapirblok; Træpanel; Andet
sv: Inkluderade yttyper: Dukblock; Dukpannå; Keramik; Tyg/textil; Blandteknikblock; Ingen yta ingår; Skissblock; Spänd duk; Akvarellblock; Träpannå; Övrigt
cs: Obsažené typy podkladů: Plátěný blok; Deska s plátnem; Keramika; Látka / textilie; Blok papírů pro kombinovanou techniku; Povrch není součástí; Náčrtník; Napnuté plátno; Blok akvarelových papírů; Dřevěná deska; Jiné
zh-CN: 包含的画材表面类型: 帆布画本; 帆布画板; 陶瓷; 面料/纺织品; 混合媒体画本; 不包含任何表面; 素描本; 绷框画布; 水彩画本; 木板; 其他
sl-SI: Vključene vrste površin: Blok s platnom; Slikarska plošča; Keramika; Tkanina / tekstil; Blok papirja za mešane tehnike; Površina ni vključena; Blok za skiciranje; Napeto platno; Blok papirja za akvarel; Lesena plošča; Drugo
zh-TW: 包含表面類型: 畫布本; 畫布板; 陶瓷; 布料/紡織品; 複合媒材紙本; 不含表面材質; 素描本; 繃框畫布; 水彩本; 木板; 其他
it: Tipi di superficie inclusi: Blocco di tela; Pannello telato; Ceramica; Tessuto/Tessile; Blocco di carta per tecniche miste; Nessuna superficie inclusa; Blocco di carta per schizzi; Tela intelaiata; Blocco di carta per acquerello; Pannello di legno; Altro
tr: Dahil olan yüzey tipleri: Tuval blok; Tuval pano; Seramik; Kumaş/Tekstil; Karışık teknik kağıt bloku; Yüzey dahil değildir; Eskiz defteri; Gerilmiş tuval; Sulu boya kağıt bloku; Ahşap panel; Diğer
lt-LT: Įtraukti paviršių tipai: Drobės bloknotas; Drobės plokštė; Keramika; Audinys / tekstilė; Mišrios technikos popieriaus bloknotas; Paviršiaus nepridėta; Eskizų popieriaus bloknotas; Įtempta drobė; Akvarelinio popieriaus bloknotas; Medžio plokštė; Kita
hu: Tartalmazott felülettípusok: Vászontömb; Vászonpanel; Kerámia; Szövet/textília; Vegyes technikájú papírtömb; Nincs felület mellékelve; Vázlatfüzet; Feszített vászon; Akvarell papírtömb; Fapanel; Egyéb
hr-HR: Uključene vrste površina: Blok s platnom; Ploča od platna; Keramika; Tkanina/tekstil; Blok papira za miješane tehnike; Podloga nije uključena; Blok papira za skiciranje; Napeto platno; Blok papira za akvarel; Drvena ploča; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipos de superfície incluídos: Bloco de tela; Painel de tela; Cerâmica; Tecido/têxtil; Bloco de papel para técnica mista; Nenhuma superfície incluída; Bloco de papel para esboço; Tela esticada; Bloco de papel para aguarela; Painel de madeira; Outro
es: Tipos de superficie incluidos: Bloc de lienzo; Panel de lienzo; Cerámica; Tela o textil; Bloc de papel para técnica mixta; No incluye superficie; Bloc de papel de dibujo; Lienzo en bastidor; Bloc de papel para acuarela; Panel de madera; Otro
de: Enthaltene Oberflächenarten: Leinwandblock; Leinwandplatte; Keramik; Stoff/Textil; Mixed-Media-Papierblock; Keine Oberfläche enthalten; Skizzenpapierblock; Aufgespannte Leinwand; Aquarellpapierblock; Holzplatte; Sonstige
bg-BG: Включени видове повърхности: Блок с платно; Каширано платно; Керамика; Плат/Текстил; Скицник за смесена техника; Не е включена повърхност; Скицник за рисуване; Опънато платно; Скицник за акварел; Дървен панел; Друго
ko: 포함된 표면 유형: 캔버스 패드; 캔버스 패널; 세라믹; 직물/원단; 혼합 미디어 용지 패드; 표면재 포함되지 않음; 스케치북 패드; 스트레치 캔버스; 수채화 용지 패드; 목재 패널; 기타
nl: Meegeleverde oppervlaktetypes: Canvasblok; Canvaspaneel; Keramiek; Stof/textiel; Mixed media-papierblok; Geen oppervlak inbegrepen; Schetspapierblok; Opgespannen canvas; Aquarelpapierblok; Houten paneel; Overig
vi: Các loại bề mặt bao gồm: Tập giấy vẽ canvas; Tấm canvas; Gốm sứ; Vải/Hàng dệt may; Tập giấy đa chất liệu; Không có bề mặt đi kèm; Tập giấy phác thảo; Canvas căng khung; Tập giấy màu nước; Tấm gỗ; Khác
sk-SK: Zahrnuté typy povrchov: Plátenný blok; Plátenná doska; Keramika; Látka/Textil; Blok na kombinovanú techniku; Bez povrchu; Blok na skicovanie; Napnuté plátno; Blok na akvarel; Drevený panel; Iné
en: Surface types included: Canvas pad; Canvas panel; Ceramic; Fabric/Textile; Mixed media paper pad; No surface included; Sketch paper pad; Stretched canvas; Watercolor paper pad; Wood panel; Other
pl: Typy powierzchni w zestawie: Blok płócienny; Podobrazie płytowe; Ceramika; Tkanina/materiał; Blok do technik mieszanych; Brak powierzchni w zestawie; Szkicownik; Podobrazie naciągane; Blok do akwareli; Panel drewniany; Inne
th: ประเภทพื้นผิวที่รวมอยู่: สมุดวาดภาพแคนวาส; แคนวาสบอร์ด; เซรามิก; ผ้า/สิ่งทอ; สมุดวาดภาพสื่อผสม; ไม่มีพื้นผิวมาให้; สมุดสเก็ตช์ภาพ; แคนวาสขึงเฟรม; สมุดวาดภาพสีน้ำ; กระดานไม้; อื่นๆ
el: Περιλαμβάνονται τύποι επιφανειών: Μπλοκ καμβά; Πάνελ καμβά; Κεραμικό; Ύφασμα; Μπλοκ χαρτιού μεικτής τεχνικής; Δεν περιλαμβάνεται επιφάνεια; Μπλοκ σχεδίου; Τεντωμένος καμβάς; Μπλοκ χαρτιού ακουαρέλας; Ξύλινο πάνελ; Άλλο
nb: Overflatetyper inkludert: Lerretblokk; Lerretsplate; Keramikk; Stoff/tekstil; Papirblokk for mixed media; Ingen overflate inkludert; Skisseblokk; Oppsspent lerret; Akvarellblokk; Trepanel; Annet
pt-BR: Tipos de superfície incluídos: Bloco de tela; Painel de tela; Cerâmica; Tecido/Têxtil; Bloco de papel para técnicas mistas; Nenhuma superfície incluída; Bloco de papel para esboço; Tela esticada; Bloco de papel para aquarela; Painel de madeira; Outras